Vermont, session 2025-2026, H643.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5) is amended to read:
(5) one-third of the revenues raised from the purchase and use tax
imposed by 32 V.S.A. chapter 219, not to exceed $50,000,000.00 annually,
notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 11(1);
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5) is amended to read:
(5) one-third of the revenues raised from the purchase and use tax
imposed by 32 V.S.A. chapter 219, not to exceed $50,000,000.00
$40,000,000.00 annually, notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 11(1);
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5) is amended to read:
(5) one-third of the revenues raised from the purchase and use tax
imposed by 32 V.S.A. chapter 219, not to exceed $40,000,000.00
$30,000,000.00 annually, notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 11(1);
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5) is amended to read:
(5) one-third of the revenues raised from the purchase and use tax
imposed by 32 V.S.A. chapter 219, not to exceed $30,000,000.00
$20,000,000.00 annually, notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 11(1);
Sec. 5. 16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5) is amended to read:
(5) one-third of the revenues raised from the purchase and use tax
imposed by 32 V.S.A. chapter 219, not to exceed $20,000,000.00
$10,000,000.00 annually, notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 11(1);
VT LEG #385120 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.643
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 6. 16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5) is amended to read:
(5) one-third of the revenues raised from the purchase and use tax
imposed by 32 V.S.A. chapter 219, not to exceed $10,000,000.00 annually,
notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 11(1); [Repealed.]
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 1 (16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5)) shall take effect on
July 1, 2026.
(b) Sec. 2 (16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5)) shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
(c) Sec. 3 (16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5)) shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
(d) Sec. 4 (16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5)) shall take effect on July 1, 2029.
(e) Sec. 5 (16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5)) shall take effect on July 1, 2030.
(f) Sec. 6 (16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(5)) shall take effect on July 1, 2031.
VT LEG #385120 v.1